Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.530.060

Expense of county treasurer.

At any time after the issuance of such bonds as in this chapter provided, and in the discharge of the duties imposed upon said county treasurer, should any incidental expense, costs or charges arise, the said county treasurer shall present his or her claim for the same to the board of directors of the school district issuing such bonds, and the same shall be audited and paid in the same manner as other services are paid under the provisions of law.

[ 1990 c 33 s 480; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.51.200. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 330 s 14; RRS s 4954; prior: 1897 c 118 s 126; 1890 p 50 s 10. Formerly RCW 28A.51.200, 28.51.200.]